Illinois, session 104th, SB1464.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 19-2, 19-2.6, and 19-3 and by adding Section 20-16 as 6follows: 7    (10 ILCS 5/19-2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 19-2)8    Sec. 19-2. Except as otherwise provided in this Code, any 9elector as defined in Section 19-1 may by mail or 10electronically on the website of the appropriate election 11authority, not more than 90 nor less than 5 days prior to the 12date of such election, or by personal delivery not more than 90 13nor less than one day prior to the date of such election, make 14application to the county clerk or to the Board of Election 15Commissioners for an official ballot for the voter's precinct 16to be voted at such election. Such a ballot shall be delivered 17to the elector only upon separate application by the elector 18for each election. Voters who make an application for 19permanent vote by mail ballot status shall follow the 20procedures specified in Section 19-3 and may apply year round. 21Voters whose application for permanent vote by mail status is 22accepted by the election authority shall remain on the 23permanent vote by mail list until the voter requests to be   SB1464- 2 -LRB104 08581 SPS 18633 b1removed from permanent vote by mail status, the voter provides 2notice to the election authority of a change in registration 3that affects their registration status, or the election 4authority receives confirmation that the voter has 5subsequently registered to vote in another election authority 6jurisdiction. If a voter with a print disability's application 7for permanent vote by mail status is accepted by the election 8authority and the voter with a print disability requested an 9accessible vote by mail ballot under Section 19-2.6, the voter 10with a print disability shall receive an accessible vote by 11mail ballot for every election the voter with a print 12disability remains on the permanent vote by mail list. The URL 13address at which voters may electronically request a vote by 14mail ballot shall be fixed no later than 90 calendar days 15before an election and shall not be changed until after the 16election. 17(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-668, eff. 11-15-21; 18102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 19    (10 ILCS 5/19-2.6)20    Sec. 19-2.6. Vote by mail; voters with a print disability.21    (a) Definitions. As used in this Section, unless the 22context otherwise requires:23    "Assistive technology" means any equipment, software, or 24product used to increase, maintain, or improve the functional 25capabilities of individuals with disabilities, including, but   SB1464- 3 -LRB104 08581 SPS 18633 b1not limited to, screen reading and magnification software, 2refreshable Braille displays, and speech recognition programs.3    "Certified remote accessible vote by mail system" means, 4for elections that occur before the 2026 general election, a 5process approved by the State Board of Elections through which 6an election authority provides for the electronic transmission 7of a vote by mail ballot to a voter with a print disability and 8through which the voter with a print disability marks and 9verifies the voter's ballot using assistive technology. 10"Certified remote accessible vote by mail system" means, for 11all elections subsequent to the 2026 general election, a 12process approved by the State Board of Elections through which 13an election authority provides for the electronic transmission 14of a vote by mail ballot to a voter with a print disability and 15through which the voter with a print disability marks, 16verifies, and returns the voter's ballot to the election 17authority electronically using assistive technology.18    "Electronic transmission" means the transfer of data or 19information through an authorized electronic data interchange 20system. 21    "Voter with a print disability" means a person having a 22temporary or permanent physical or mental impairment, such as 23blindness, low vision, physical dexterity limitations, or 24learning or cognitive disabilities, that prevents the person 25from effective reading, writing, or use of printed material. 26    (b) The State Board of Elections shall provide a certified   SB1464- 4 -LRB104 08581 SPS 18633 b1remote accessible vote by mail system for the General Election 2of November 8, 2022 and all subsequent elections that occur 3before the 2026 general election, through which a vote by mail 4ballot can be delivered by electronic transmission to voters 5with print disabilities and through which voters with print 6disabilities are able to mark and verify their ballots using 7assistive technology. 8    (c) For the November 8, 2022 general election and all 9subsequent elections that occur on or before the 2026 general 10election, election Election authorities shall permit voters 11with a print disability to receive and mark their vote by mail 12ballots (i) through the certified remote accessible vote by 13mail system provided by the State Board of Elections pursuant 14to subsection (b) of this Section or (ii) through a certified 15remote accessible vote by mail system provided by the election 16authority. 17    (d) If a vote by mail ballot application from a voter with 18a print disability arrives after the jurisdiction begins 19transmitting vote by mail ballots and instructions to voters, 20the election authority shall electronically transmit the 21ballot, instructions, and balloting materials to the voter 22within two business days after receipt of the application. 23    (e) Ballots received and marked pursuant to subsections 24(b) and (c) of this Section must be printed by the voter and 25returned to the election authority as provided in Section 2619-6.   SB1464- 5 -LRB104 08581 SPS 18633 b1    (f) For all elections subsequent to the 2026 general 2election, the State Board of Elections shall provide a 3certified remote accessible vote by mail system through which 4an election authority can deliver a vote by mail ballot 5through electronic transmission to voters with a print through 6electronic transmission to voters with a print disability and 7through which voters with a print disability can mark, verify, 8and return a vote by mail ballot to the election authority 9electronically.10    (g) To ensure that voters with a print disability are able 11to complete all aspects of the vote by mail process privately 12and independently, the State Board of Elections shall 13establish a method that allows voters with a print disability 14to electronically authenticate a vote by mail ballot without 15assistance, and election authorities shall use that method of 16authentication.17    (h) All electronic documents and web pages that must be 18used as part of the certified remote accessible vote by mail 19system provided by the State Board of Elections or election 20authorities shall be compliant with the Web Content 21Accessibility Guidelines 2.1 Level AA standards and updated as 22necessary to comply with any subsequent Web Content 23Accessibility Guidelines standards. 24    (i) (f) The State Board of Elections shall adopt rules, 25including emergency rules, necessary for the implementation of 26this Section. The State Board of Elections' adopted rules   SB1464- 6 -LRB104 08581 SPS 18633 b1shall include certification standards for a remote accessible 2vote by mail system and a method subject to the provisions in 3Sections 19-2 and 19-3 of this Article by which a voter with a 4print disability may request to use a certified remote 5accessible vote by mail system and apply for an accessible 6vote by mail ballot. 7(Source: P.A. 102-819, eff. 5-13-22.) 8    (10 ILCS 5/19-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 19-3)9    Sec. 19-3. Application for a vote by mail ballot.10    (a) The application for a vote by mail ballot for a single 11election shall be substantially in the following form:12APPLICATION FOR VOTE BY MAIL BALLOT13    To be voted at the .... election in the County of .... and 14State of Illinois.15    I state that I am a resident of .... in the municipality of 16.... in the county of ....; that I have resided at such address 17for at least 30 days; that I am lawfully entitled to vote at 18the .... election to be held on ....; and that I wish to vote 19by mail.20    I hereby make application for an official ballot or 21ballots to be voted by me at such election, and I agree that I 22shall return such ballot or ballots to the official issuing 23the same prior to the closing of the polls on the date of the 24election or, if returned by mail, postmarked no later than 25election day, for counting no later than during the period for   SB1464- 7 -LRB104 08581 SPS 18633 b1counting provisional ballots, the last day of which is the 214th day following election day.3    I understand that this application is made for an official 4vote by mail ballot or ballots to be voted by me at the 5election specified in this application and that I must submit 6a separate application for an official vote by mail ballot or 7ballots to be voted by me at any subsequent election. 8    Under penalties as provided by law pursuant to Section 929-10 of the Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the 10statements set forth in this application are true and correct.11....12*fill in either (1), (2) or (3).13Post office address to which ballot is mailed:14...............15    (a-5) The application for a single vote by mail ballot 16transmitted electronically pursuant to Section 19-2.6 shall be 17substantively similar to the application for a vote by mail 18ballot for a single election and shall include:19        I swear or affirm that I am a voter with a print 20    disability, and, as a result of this disability, I am 21    making a request to receive a vote by mail ballot 22    electronically so that I may privately and independently 23    mark, verify, and print my vote by mail ballot. 24    (b) The application for permanent vote by mail status 25shall be substantially in the following form:26APPLICATION FOR PERMANENT VOTE BY MAIL STATUS  SB1464- 8 -LRB104 08581 SPS 18633 b1    I am currently a registered voter and wish to apply for 2permanent vote by mail status.3    I state that I am a resident of .... in the municipality of 4.... in the county of ....; that I have resided at such address 5for at least 30 days; that I am lawfully entitled to vote at 6the .... election to be held on ....; and that I wish to vote 7by mail in:8    ..... all subsequent elections that do not require a party 9        designation. 10    ..... all subsequent elections, and I wish to receive a 11        ................... Party vote by mail ballot in 12        elections that require a party designation.13    I hereby make application for an official ballot or 14ballots to be voted by me at such election, and I agree that I 15shall return such ballot or ballots to the official issuing 16the same prior to the closing of the polls on the date of the 17election or, if returned by mail, postmarked no later than 18election day, for counting no later than during the period for 19counting provisional ballots, the last day of which is the 2014th day following election day.21    Under penalties as provided by law under Section 29-10 of 22the Election Code, the undersigned certifies that the 23statements set forth in this application are true and correct.24.... 25Post office address to which ballot is mailed:26...............  SB1464- 9 -LRB104 08581 SPS 18633 b1    (b-5) The application for permanent vote by mail ballots 2transmitted electronically pursuant to Section 19-2.6 shall be 3substantively similar to the application for permanent vote by 4mail status and shall include: 5        I swear or affirm that I am a voter with a 6    non-temporary print disability, and as a result of this 7    disability, I am making a request to receive vote by mail 8    ballots electronically so that I may privately and 9    independently mark, verify, and print my vote by mail 10    ballots. 11    (c) However, if application is made for a primary election 12ballot, such application shall require the applicant to 13designate the name of the political party with which the 14applicant is affiliated. The election authority shall allow 15any voter on permanent vote by mail status to change his or her 16party affiliation for a primary election ballot by a method 17and deadline published and selected by the election authority. 18    (d) If application is made electronically, the applicant 19shall mark the box associated with the above described 20statement included as part of the online application 21certifying that the statements set forth in the application 22under subsection (a) or (b) are true and correct, and a 23signature is not required. 24    (e) Any person may produce, reproduce, distribute, or 25return to an election authority an application under this 26Section. If applications are sent to a post office box   SB1464- 10 -LRB104 08581 SPS 18633 b1controlled by any individual or organization that is not an 2election authority, those applications shall (i) include a 3valid and current phone number for the individual or 4organization controlling the post office box and (ii) be 5turned over to the appropriate election authority within 7 6days of receipt or, if received within 2 weeks of the election 7in which an applicant intends to vote, within 2 days of 8receipt. Failure to turn over the applications in compliance 9with this paragraph shall constitute a violation of this Code 10and shall be punishable as a petty offense with a fine of $100 11per application. Removing, tampering with, or otherwise 12knowingly making the postmark on the application unreadable by 13the election authority shall establish a rebuttable 14presumption of a violation of this paragraph. Upon receipt, 15the appropriate election authority shall accept and promptly 16process any application under this Section submitted in a form 17substantially similar to that required by this Section, 18including any substantially similar production or reproduction 19generated by the applicant.20    (f) An election authority may combine the applications in 21subsections (a) and (b) onto one form, but the distinction 22between the applications must be clear and the form must 23provide check boxes for an applicant to indicate whether he or 24she is applying for a single election vote by mail ballot or 25for permanent vote by mail status. 26    (g) For all elections subsequent to the effective date of   SB1464- 11 -LRB104 08581 SPS 18633 b1this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 2application shall provide an applicant with a print disability 3the ability to designate on the application that the voter has 4a print disability and is requesting an accessible vote by 5mail ballot under Section 19-2.6.6(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-819, eff. 5-13-22; 7103-467, eff. 8-4-23.) 8    (10 ILCS 5/20-16 new)9    Sec. 20-16. Certified remote accessible vote by mail 10system. Certified remote accessible vote by mail system. An 11election authority shall provide a certified remote accessible 12vote by mail system that complies with Section 19-2.6, or use 13the certified remote accessible vote by mail system provided 14by the State Board of Elections under Section 19-2.6, through 15which a vote by mail ballot can be delivered by electronic 16transmission to any voter eligible to receive a vote by mail 17ballot under this Article and through which a voter can mark, 18verify, and return a vote by mail ballot to the election 19authority electronically. The certified remote accessible vote 20by mail system shall comply with the requirements of Section 2119-2.6, except for subsection (h) of that Section, unless the 22voter is a voter with a print disability.